Utah statutes.
40-2-303.   Annual report on coal mine safety.

(1)  By October 1 of each year, the commission, office, and council shall compile and submit to the governor and the Legislature a comprehensive report of the status of coal mine safety within the state for the immediately preceding calendar year.

(2)  The report required by this section shall include:

(a)  a compilation of major coal mine accidents or other coal mine emergencies within the state during the calendar year;

(b)  a statement of actions by the commission, office, or council to implement this chapter;

(c)  without a breach in confidentiality, a summary of reports of alleged unsafe conditions received by the office, with a statement of the office's responses;

(d)  recommendations for additional action to promote coal mine safety; and

(e)  any other items the commission, office, and council consider appropriate.

